Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-142.02
Application for certificate of title indicating year, make, and model originally designated by manufacturer; procedure.

If the owner does not have a certificate of title for a vehicle manufactured more than thirty years prior to application for a certificate of title and one or more major component parts have been replaced with one or more replacement parts that are essentially the same in design and material to that originally supplied by the manufacturer for the specific year, make, and model of the vehicle, the owner may apply for a certificate of title indicating that the year, make, and model of the vehicle is that originally designated by the manufacturer by presenting a notarized bill of sale for each major component part replaced, an affidavit in support of the application for title, a statement that an inspection has been conducted on the vehicle, a statement from a car club representative pursuant to section 60-142.03, and a vehicle identification number as described in section 60-148.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 7.